Louisiana, session 2026, HB1168.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.40.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1730.40.3. Precast concrete pilings; statewide minimum standards; public and
private construction
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Transportation and
Development.
(2) "DOTD piling requirements" means the then-current requirements of the
Department of Transportation and Development applicable to precast concrete
pilings, including but not limited to the Louisiana Standard Specifications for Roads
and Bridges, supplemental specifications, standard plans, special details, technical
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2257 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1168
memoranda, quality assurance requirements, and any successor documents adopted
or published by the department.
(3) "Precast concrete piling" means a precast or precast-and-prestressed
concrete pile, including any splice, pile segment, or related component, intended for
use as a deep foundation element in a building, structure, roadway, bridge, marine
structure, industrial facility, utility structure, or other construction.
(4) "Project" means a public or private construction, reconstruction,
improvement, repair, enlargement, or other work in this state in which precast
concrete pilings are specified or installed.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each project in this
state, whether publicly or privately funded, that involves precast concrete pilings
shall use pilings that comply with DOTD piling requirements.
C. Compliance pursuant to this Section includes, but is not limited to
requirements governing all of the following:
(1) Design criteria and allowable stresses.
(2) Materials, fabrication, curing, storage, transportation, and handling.
(3) Plant quality control and quality assurance.
(4) Pile dimensions, prestressing, tolerances, and concrete strength.
(5) Pile splices, including permitted use, acceptance criteria, and inspection.
(6) Driving procedures, installation criteria, and field testing.
(7) Inspection, documentation, acceptance, rejection, and corrective action.
D. The DOTD piling requirements are hereby incorporated by reference as
the minimum standards for precast concrete pilings on all projects in this state. When
the department updates, supersedes, or replaces a requirement described in Paragraph
(A)(2) of this Section, the updated requirement shall govern beginning on the
effective date established by the department, unless otherwise provided by rule.
E. The requirements of this Section are minimum standards. If any provision
of the state uniform construction code, a local ordinance, or project specification is
more stringent than the DOTD piling requirements, the more stringent provision
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2257 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1168
applies to the extent it does not conflict with mandatory safety, design, fabrication,
or inspection requirements adopted by the department for precast concrete pilings.
F.(1) The Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council shall
promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary
to implement the provisions of this Section, including procedures for plan review,
inspections, documentation, and enforcement, in consultation with the department,
the state fire marshal, licensed design professionals, contractors, and precast concrete
manufacturers.
(2) The fire marshal, local building official, or other authority having
jurisdiction over permitting or inspection for a project shall enforce the provisions
of this Section as part of the permitting, inspection, and certificate of occupancy or
certificate of completion process.
(3) No permit shall be issued for a project subject to this Section unless the
permit applicant certifies that precast concrete pilings, if used, comply with DOTD
piling requirements.
(4) No certificate of occupancy, certificate of completion, final acceptance,
or equivalent approval shall be issued for a project subject to this Section unless the
authority having jurisdiction receives documentation of compliance with this
Section.
G. Construction documents for a project subject to this Section that includes
precast concrete pilings shall include a statement by the design professional of record
that the piling design and specifications conform to the provisions of this Section.
The contractor and the precast concrete piling manufacturer shall maintain records
sufficient to demonstrate compliance and shall furnish those records upon request by
an authority having jurisdiction over that project.
H. A violation of this Section, or of a rule promulgated in accordance with
this Section, is a violation of the state uniform construction code. An authority
having jurisdiction over the project may issue a stop-work order, withhold approval,
require corrective work, or impose any other remedy authorized by law.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2257 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1168
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.